Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2661.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 39 of the General Laws entitled "PUBLIC UTILITIES AND
CARRIERS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 36
OFFSHORE WIND PROCUREMENT POLICY COMMISSION
39-36-1. Purpose.
The purpose of this chapter is to establish a study commission to evaluate policies and
procurement structures necessary to support the long-term development of offshore wind in Rhode
Island, with the goal of procuring one thousand two hundred megawatts (1,200 MW) of offshore
wind capacity by 2030 in a manner that is cost-effective, reliable, and consistent with the state’s
climate and economic development goals, including high-quality job creation and workforce
standards.
39-36-2. Establishment of commission.
(a) There is hereby established the offshore wind study commission (“the commission”).
(b) The commission shall meet at least bi-monthly and shall sunset on December 31, 2030,
unless extended by the general assembly.
39-36-3. Membership.
(a) The fifteen (15) member commission shall consist of the following members:
(1) One member of the Rhode Island house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of

the house;
(2) One member of the Rhode Island senate, appointed by the president of the senate;
(3) The commissioner of the Rhode Island office of energy resources, or designee;
(4) The chair of the public utilities commission, or designee;
(5) The director of the department of environmental management, or designee;
(6) One representative of Rhode Island Energy, appointed by Rhode Island Energy;
(7) Two (2) representatives of an environmental or climate advocacy organization,
appointed by the environment council of Rhode Island;
(8) Two (2) representatives from organized labor having relevant experience in
construction and workforce standard implementation, appointed by the president of the Rhode
Island AFL-CIO;
(9) One representative of a ratepayers or consumer advocacy organization, appointed by
the governor;
(10) One expert in offshore wind development, finance, or supply chain activities,
appointed by the governor;
(11) One academic professional in offshore wind energy, appointed by the governor;
(12) One expert in electric grid planning or electric transmission, appointed by the
governor;
(13) One representative of a community-based environmental justice organization,
appointed by the governor.
39-36-4. Duties of the commission.
The commission shall study and make recommendations on:
(1) Offshore wind procurement authority, including whether procurement should remain
with Rhode Island Energy or be transferred to the Rhode Island office of energy resources or
another state entity;
(2) Procurement evaluation criteria, including price stability, cost containment, reliability,
high-quality job creation, workforce development, and environmental and economic benefits;
(3) Multi-state or regional procurement structures and coordination with ISO-NE states;
(4) Contract pricing and flexibility mechanisms that respond to changing market conditions
while protecting ratepayers and ensuring project viability;
(5) Identifying onshore infrastructure and workforce development needs, including ports,
transmission, and manufacturing capacity, and make recommendations to ensure Rhode Island has
the grid capacity to support offshore wind energy procurements;
(6) Identifying workforce development needs and opportunities, including registered
LC005288 - Page 2 of 5

apprenticeship utilization, local hire pathways, and supply-chain workforce needs, and make
recommendations to ensure Rhode Island has a strong workforce pipeline to support offshore wind
projects and related economic development, while promoting family-sustaining careers in the
offshore wind industry;
(7) A strategic pathway for Rhode Island to procure one thousand two hundred megawatts
(1,200 MW) of offshore wind by 2030.
39-36-5. Reporting.
The commission shall submit an annual report to the governor and the general assembly
detailing findings, recommendations, and progress toward offshore wind procurement goals. The
first report shall be due by October 30, 2027.
39-36-6. Organization and decision-making.
(a) The commission shall elect a chair and vice chair from among its members at its first
meeting.
(b) A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(c) The commission may take official action, adopt findings, or approve recommendations
only when a quorum is present, and only by an affirmative vote of a majority of the members
present and voting.
(d) The commission may establish subcommittees or working groups to support its work;
provided that, any findings or recommendations of any subcommittee or working group shall be
advisory only unless adopted by the commission pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
39-36-7. Rulemaking and regulations based on commission findings.
(a) Within one hundred eighty (180) days of the submission of the commission’s first
annual report pursuant to § 39-36-5, the Rhode Island office of energy resources (“OER”) shall
initiate a rulemaking and regulation process to implement any recommendations of the commission
that require regulatory action.
(b) The rulemaking and regulations shall include, at a minimum, the development of
regulations establishing any necessary procurement structures, evaluation criteria, labor and
workforce standards, and contract pricing mechanisms identified by the commission to support the
state’s strategic pathway to procure one thousand two hundred megawatts (1,200 MW) of offshore
wind by 2030.
(c) If the office of energy resources determines that one or more commission
recommendations cannot be implemented through rulemaking, regulation or are not in the public
interest, OER shall submit a written explanation to the governor and the general assembly detailing
LC005288 - Page 3 of 5

the reasons for such determination.
39-36-8. Effective date of chapter.
Upon the effective date of this chapter, the commission seats shall be appointed by
September 30, 2026, and the first meeting of this commission shall take place by October 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005288
========
LC005288 - Page 4 of 5